Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6035.
people of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 3 4 5 part 1 line-item appropriations FOR FISCAL YEAR 2025-2026 Sec. 101. There is appropriated for the various state departments and agencies described in this part for the fiscal year 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 ending September 30, 2026, from the following funds: APPROPRIATION SUMMARY GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 10,000,000 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 10,000,000 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 0 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 0 Total other state restricted revenues 0 State general fund/general purpose $ 10,000,000 Sec. 102. DEPARTMENT OF LIFELONG EDUCATION, ADVANCEMENT, AND POTENTIAL (1) APPROPRIATION SUMMARY GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 10,000,000 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 10,000,000 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 0 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 0 Total other state restricted revenues 0 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 State general fund/general purpose $ 10,000,000 (2) ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS Tri-Share â employer incentives and outreach $ 2,500,000 Tri-Share - program delivery and expansion 7,500,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 10,000,000 Appropriated from: State general fund/general purpose $ 10,000,000 PART 2 PROVISIONS CONCERNING APPROPRIATIONS FOR FISCAL YEAR 2025-2026 GENERAL SECTIONS Sec. 201. In accordance with section 30 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963, for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026, total state spending under part 1 from state sources is $10,000,000.00 and state spending under part 1 from state sources to be paid to local units of government is $0.00. Sec. 202. The appropriations under this part and part 1 are subject to the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101 to 18.1594. DEPARTMENT OF LIFELONG EDUCATION, ADVANCEMENT, AND POTENTIAL Sec. 301. Funds appropriated in part 1 for Tri-Share â employer incentives and outreach must be expended by the department on 1-time sign-up incentives for employers and for other marketing strategies that lead to an increase in employer participation. Sec. 302. Funds appropriated in part 1 for Tri-Share â program delivery and expansion must be expended by the department on 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 expanding the MI Tri-Share Child Care Program to assist employers with recruiting and retaining employees by helping families afford child care so employees can obtain or retain employment in this state. The department may also use the funds to pay for administrative costs associated with the MI Care-Share program that is an optional add on to the MI Tri-Share Child Care Program, but may not use the funds to provide a state subsidy for child care expenses under the MI Care-Share program.